District of Columbia statutes.
8-435

Pesticide education.

[Not funded].

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 6, 59 DCR 10166
Section 14(b) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 6 and 7 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register, but not before October 1, 2013.